Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6167.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to regulate and license pet shops, animal control shelters, and animal protection shelters, ; small-scale dog breeding kennels, and large-scale dog breeding kennels; to require inspections; to establish uniform procedures and minimum requirements for the adoption of dogs, cats, and ferrets; and to prescribe penalties and civil fines; and to require the promulgation of rules; to provide remedies; and to repeal acts and parts of acts. Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Adoption" means a transfer of ownership, with or without remuneration, of an animal from an animal control shelter or animal protection shelter to an individual for the purpose of being a companion animal for that individual. As used in this subdivision, a companion animal includes, but is not limited to, a dog that is used for hunting or as a guard dog. (b) "Alteration" means a professional sterilization procedure performed by a veterinarian that renders a dog, cat, or ferret incapable of reproducing. (c) "Altered", in reference to a dog, cat, or ferret, means having undergone alteration. (d) Except as provided in section 8b, "animal" means a mammal except livestock, as that term is defined in section 1 1937 PA 284, MCL 287.121, to MCL 287.131, and rodents. (e) "Animal abuse offense" means 1 or more of the following, but does not include the lawful use of an animal to hunt or to participate in field trials or the lawful killing or other use of an animal in farming or a generally accepted animal husbandry or farming practice involving livestock: (i) A violation of section 49 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.49. (ii) A violation of section 50 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50. (iii) A violation of section 50a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50a. (iv) A violation of section 50b of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50b. (v) A violation of section 50c of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50c. (vi) A violation of section 158 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.158, if the violation arose out of a crime against nature with an animal. (vii) A violation of a local ordinance that substantially corresponding corresponds to a violation described in subparagraphs (i) to (vi). (viii) An attempt or conspiracy to commit an offense described in subparagraphs (i) to (vii). (f) "Animal control shelter" means a facility operated by a municipality for the impoundment and care of animals that are found in the streets or at large, animals that are otherwise held due to the violation of a municipal ordinance or state law, or animals that are surrendered to the animal control shelter. (g) "Animal protection shelter" means a facility operated by a person, humane society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, private animal rescue organization, or any other nonprofit organization for the care of homeless animals. Animal protection shelter includes the following: (i) An animal sanctuary, which is a private facility that is not used for impoundment, but keeps animals exclusively for the purpose of caring for and housing the animals indefinitely. An animal sanctuary described under this subparagraph includes an organization that does not maintain a central facility for keeping animals or is foster based. (ii) A rescue facility that houses animals while the animals wait for adoption or permanent placement. A rescue facility described under this subparagraph includes an organization that does not maintain a central facility for keeping animals or is foster based. (h) "Cat" means a domestic cat of any age of the species Felis catus.Felis catus. (i) "Department" means the state department of agriculture and rural development. (j) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her authorized representative. (j) (k) "Dog" means a domestic dog of any age of the species Canis familiaris.Canis lupus familiaris. (k) (l) "Ferret" means an animal of any age of the species Mustela furo.Mustela furo. (l) "Foster based" means an entity that utilizes temporary or continual foster agreements with a foster facility to house animals under the entity's care. (m) "Foster facility" means a place where an animal control shelter or animal protection shelter, without or in addition to a central facility, keeps animals awaiting placement in a permanent home. Foster facility includes a private home. (n) "Housed or kept for the primary purpose of breeding" means that a female dog has previously been bred and whelped. A female dog that has not previously produced offspring is not considered to have been housed or kept for the primary purpose of breeding. (o) (m) "ICHAT" means the internet criminal history access tool maintained by the department of state police. (p) (n) "Intact dog" means a dog that has not been altered. (q) (o) "Large-scale dog breeding kennel" means a facility where more than 15 female intact dogs over the age of 4 months are housed or kept for the primary purpose of breeding. As used in this subdivision, "housed or kept for the primary purpose of breeding" means that the female dog has previously been bred and whelped. A female dog that has not previously produced offspring shall not be considered to have been housed or kept for the primary purpose of breeding. (r) (p) "Municipality" means a county, city, village, or township. (s) (q) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (t) (r) "Pet health certificate" means a certificate in a form prescribed by the director department in which a veterinarian attests to the species, age, sex, breed, and description of an animal; any medical conditions of the animal; any medical treatment and vaccinations that the animal received while under the control of a pet shop or large-scale dog breeding kennel; and to the fact that at the time of the preparation of the certificate the veterinarian examined the animal and found the animal free from visual evidence of communicable disease. (u) (s) "Pet shop" means a place where animals are sold, exchanged, or transferred, or offered for sale, exchange, or transfer. (v) "Small-scale dog breeding kennel" means a facility where more than 5 but less than 16 female intact dogs over the age of 4 months are housed or kept for the primary purpose of breeding. (w) (t) "Veterinarian" means a person licensed to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine under part 188 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18801 to 333.18838. Sec. 2. (1) The department shall promulgate rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to establish procedures and requirements, including fees for inspections required under section 5. (2) The department may promulgate rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to accomplish do any of the following: (a) Accomplish the purposes of this act. and to establish (b) Establish minimum standards for the housing, care, and handling of animals to insure the humane care and handling of animals. The department may also promulgate rules to establish (c) Establish minimum standards for small-scale dog breeding kennels and large-scale dog breeding kennels. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (d) Establish minimum standards for foster facilities and foster agreements. (3) (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, until the department promulgates rules under subsection (1), (2), a small-scale dog breeding kennel and a large-scale dog breeding kennel is are subject to R 285.151.1 to R 285.151.41 of the Michigan administrative code. Administrative Code. Notwithstanding R 285.151.25 of the Michigan administrative code, Administrative Code, in a small-scale dog breeding kennel or large-scale dog breeding kennel, a female dog in estrus may be housed with intact male dogs for the purpose of breeding. Sec. 3. No Beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not operate a an animal control shelter, animal protection shelter, or pet shop unless he has first received a license from the department of agriculture the person has been granted a license under the provisions of this act.section 4. Sec. 4. (1) Applications for A person shall apply for an initial or renewal license to operate an animal control shelter, animal protection shelter, or pet shop licenses must be on a form as provided or made available by the director. Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2012, the director shall issue pet shop licenses for a term of 1 year beginning January 1 of each year. After September 30, 2012, the director shall issue a pet shop license upon application and payment of a license fee of $150.00. (2) Subject to subsection (6) and until September 30, 2012, the department shall charge a fee of $200.00 for an initial application for a pet shop license and a fee of $100.00 for renewal of a pet shop license. (3) Until September 30, 2012 and except as otherwise provided for in this section, a pet shop license is renewable by submission of a completed renewal application provided or made available by the department and payment of the renewal fee described in subsection (2). (4) The department shall deposit all license fees, inspection fees, other noncriminal fines or fees, and administrative fines received pursuant to this act into the agriculture licensing and inspection fees fund created in section 9 of the insect pest and plant disease act, 1931 PA 189, MCL 286.209, to be used, pursuant to appropriation, by the director in administering and carrying out those duties required by law under this act.on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. The applicant shall include with the application all of the following information: (a) If the applicant is an individual, the individual's name, email address, and phone number. If the applicant is a business entity, the name of the business entity and the name, email address, and phone number of the business entity's authorized representative. (b) Facility address and, if different, mailing address. (c) Type and number of animals that can be housed or kept at the addresses listed in subdivision (b), as applicable. (d) An emergency and contingency plan that provides for the humane handling, treatment, transportation, housing, and care of animals in the care of or otherwise kept by the applicant in the event of an emergency or disaster. (e) Other information required by the department. (2) The department shall grant an applicant a license to operate an animal control shelter, animal protection shelter, or pet shop if the applicant does all of the following: (a) Submits a completed application under subsection (1). (b) Pays the license fee under subsection (3). (c) Completes and passes an inspection under section 5. (3) An applicant shall include with an application for a license a $500.00 license fee. (4) A license granted under this section is valid for 1 year from the date of issuance. (5) Beginning January 1, 2030, and by January 1 every 5 years thereafter, the department may adjust the license fee in subsection (3) by comparing the percentage increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index for the preceding year by the corresponding Consumer Price Index 5 years earlier. The department shall multiply that percentage change by the amount of the license fee in subsection (3), and round up the dollar value adjustment made under this subsection to the nearest dollar. As used in this subsection, "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (6) (5) Beginning July 23, 2004, the The department shall issue an initial or renewal pet shop approve or deny an application for a license not later than under this section not later than 90 days after the applicant files submits a completed application. Receipt of the application is considered the date the application is received by any agency or department of this state. If the application is considered incomplete, by the department, the department shall notify the applicant in writing, or make the information electronically available, within not later than 30 days after receipt of the incomplete application, describing and state the deficiency and requesting the request additional information or require that certain actions be taken. The 90-day period to approve or deny an application under this subsection is tolled upon notification by when the department notifies the applicant of a deficiency. until the date Unless an extension is granted by the department, the applicant must provide the requested additional information is received by to the department or complete any required actions not later than 30 days after the notice of the deficiency is received. The applicant may request an extension to the 30-day timeline to provide additional information or complete required actions on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. The determination of the completeness of an application is not an approval of the application for the license and does not confer eligibility of an applicant determined otherwise ineligible for issuance of a license. (7) (6) If the department fails to issue approve or deny a an application for a license under this section within the time required by this section, under subsection (6), the department shall return the license fee and shall reduce the license fee for the applicant's next renewal application, if any, by 15%. The failure Failure to issue a license within the time required under this subsection approve or deny an application for a license does not allow the department to otherwise delay the processing of the application, and that application, upon completion, when complete, must be placed in sequence with other completed applications received at that the same time. The department shall not discriminate against an applicant in the processing of the application based upon on the fact that the license fee was refunded or discounted under this subsection. (7) As used in this section, "completed application" means an application complete on its face and submitted with any applicable licensing fees as well as any other information, records, approval, security, or similar item required by law or rule from a local unit of government, a federal agency, or a private entity but not from another department or agency of this state. In the case of an initial application, completed application includes the completion of construction or renovation of any facility and the passing of a satisfactory inspection. Sec. 5. (1) The director of agriculture department shall not issue a license to operate a pet shop until he has inspected the inspect the premises to assure that it complies with the provisions of this act and the rules of the department of agriculture.of a proposed or existing animal control shelter, animal protection shelter, or pet shop after a completed application for a license is received by the department under section 4 to ensure compliance with this act and the rules promulgated under this act. (2) The department may inspect the premises of a proposed or existing small-scale dog breeding kennel or, if applicable, a large-scale dog breeding kennel, after a completed application for a license is received by the department under section 8 to ensure compliance with this act and the rules promulgated under this act. (3) If an applicant fails an inspection under subsection (1) or (2), the applicant must be reinspected by the department not later than 30 days after the failed inspection. If an applicant fails a second inspection, the applicant must be reinspected a third time, or a fourth time, as applicable. If an applicant fails 4 inspections under this section, the department shall not issue a license, and the applicant must wait at least 6 months after the date of the last failed inspection before submitting a new application for a license under section 4 or 8, as applicable. An applicant is responsible for a $250.00 fee for a third or fourth inspection conducted under this subsection. Sec. 5a. (1) A person who operates a pet shop shall not import or cause to be imported into this state a dog or cat that is less than 8 weeks old. A person who operates an An animal control shelter or an animal protection shelter shall not import or cause to be imported into this state a dog or cat that is less than 8 weeks old unless the dog or cat is imported with its dam. A small-scale dog breeding kennel or large-scale dog breeding kennel shall not import or cause to be imported into this state a dog that is less than 8 weeks old unless the dog is imported with its dam. (2) A person who operates a pet shop shall not sell, exchange, transfer, or offer for sale, exchange, or transfer a dog or cat that is less than 8 weeks old. A small-scale dog breeding kennel or large-scale dog breeding kennel shall not sell, exchange, or transfer a dog that is less than 8 weeks old. (3) A person that operates a pet shop, an animal control shelter, an animal protection shelter, small-scale dog breeding kennel, or a large-scale dog breeding kennel shall not import or cause to be imported into this state, or sell, adopt, exchange, or transfer, or offer for sale, adoption, exchange, or transfer a dog, unless all of the following are satisfied before the dog's entry into this state: (a) The dog has been is vaccinated against distemper, parvovirus, and canine adenovirus-2 . The and, if the dog shall also be vaccinated against is 12 weeks of age or older, rabies and leptospirosis. if the dog is 12 weeks of age or older. If a A veterinarian shall administer a rabies vaccine. is required under this subdivision, the vaccine shall be administered by an accredited veterinarian. A person operating a pet shop, small-scale breeding kennel, or a large-scale dog breeding kennel shall ensure that vaccinations vaccines other than the rabies vaccination vaccine are administered not less than 7 days before the dog's entry into this state. The director department may require vaccinations against other diseases not specified in this subdivision. (b) If indicated, the dog has been treated for external and internal parasites so that the dog is not capable of spreading external or internal parasites to another animal at the time it the dog is imported into this state. (c) The dog is accompanied by an interstate health certificate or certificate of veterinary inspection signed by an accredited a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in the dog's state of origin, including records of the dog's medication and immunization. (4) A person who operates a pet shop, an animal control shelter, or an animal protection shelter shall not import or cause to be imported into this state, or sell, adopt, exchange, or transfer, or offer for sale, adoption, exchange, or transfer a cat, unless all of the following are satisfied before the cat's entry into this state: (a) The cat has been is vaccinated against feline panleukopenia, calici viruses, and feline herpes virus-1 . The and, if the cat shall also be vaccinated against is 12 weeks of age or older, rabies. if the cat is 12 weeks of age or older. If A veterinarian shall administer a rabies vaccine. is required under this subdivision, the vaccine shall be administered by an accredited veterinarian. A person operating a pet shop shall ensure that vaccinations vaccines other than the rabies vaccination vaccine are administered to the cat as required by this subdivision not less than 7 days before the cat's entry into this state. The director department may require vaccinations against other diseases not specified in this subdivision. (b) If indicated, the cat has been treated for external and internal parasites so that the cat is not capable of spreading external or internal parasites to another animal at the time it the cat is imported into this state. (c) The cat is accompanied by an interstate health certificate or certificate of veterinary inspection filled out and signed by an accredited a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in the cat's state of origin, including records of the cat's medication and immunization. (5) A person who operates a pet shop, small-scale dog breeding kennel, or a large-scale dog breeding kennel shall not sell, exchange, transfer, or deliver a dog, cat, or ferret without providing to the purchaser a valid pet health certificate. For purposes of this subsection, a pet health certificate is only valid for 30 days after the date the animal was examined by the veterinarian who signed the certificate. Sec. 6. (1) A municipality shall not operate an animal control shelter unless the animal control shelter is registered with the department. (2) A society for the prevention of cruelty to animals or any other person shall not operate an animal protection shelter unless the shelter is registered with the department. (3) A person shall not operate a large-scale dog breeding kennel unless the large-scale dog breeding kennel is registered with the department. The department shall charge an annual fee of $500.00 per registration of a large-scale dog breeding kennel. (4) This act is not intended to apply to a dog owner or breeder other than a person that operates a large-scale dog breeding kennel.The department shall deposit all of the following into the agriculture licensing and inspection fees fund created in section 9 of the insect pest and plant disease act, 1931 PA 189, MCL 286.209: (a) A license fee collected under sections 4 and 8. (b) An inspection fee, including a fee collected under section 5(3). (c) An administrative fine collected under section 9b. Sec. 7. (1) Application for registration of an animal control shelter, an animal protection shelter, or a large-scale dog breeding kennel shall be on a form prescribed by the director.A foster facility shall not house more than 8 adult dogs or cats at a time. If a foster facility is housing a female dog with puppies under 8 weeks of age or a female cat with kittens under 8 weeks of age, the female dog and puppies or the female cat and kittens are considered 1 adult dog or cat for purposes of this section. A foster facility that is a private home may submit a written request to the animal control shelter or animal protection shelter with which the foster facility coordinates for the care of animals, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department, for an exemption from the limits imposed under this section. The animal control shelter or animal protection shelter with which the foster facility coordinates for the care of animals may grant an exemption only on finding that the foster facility has demonstrated adequate provisions and safeguards to ensure the safety and well-being of the animals in the care of the foster facility. (2) A foster agreement and contact information for the foster facility must be kept on file, and made available to the department on request, by the foster facility and the animal control shelter or animal protection shelter with which the foster facility coordinates. Sec. 7a. Beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not operate a small-scale dog breeding kennel or large-scale dog breeding kennel unless the person has been granted a license under section 8. Sec. 8. (1) The department shall not register an animal control shelter or animal protection shelter unless the department first inspects it to ensure that it complies with this act and the rules promulgated under this act.A person shall apply for an initial or renewal license to operate a small-scale dog breeding kennel or large-scale dog breeding kennel on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. The applicant shall include with the application all of the following information: (a) If the applicant is an individual, the individual's name, email address, and phone number. If the applicant is a business entity, the name of the business entity and the name, email address, and phone number of the business entity's authorized representative. (b) Facility address and, if different, mailing address. (c) Type and number of animals that can be housed or kept at the addresses listed in subdivision (b), as applicable. (d) An emergency and contingency plan that provides for the humane handling, treatment, transportation, housing, and care of dogs housed or kept by the applicant in the event of an emergency or disaster. (e) Other information required by the department. (2) The department shall grant an applicant a license to operate a small-scale dog breeding kennel or large-scale dog breeding kennel, as applicable, if the applicant does all of the following: (a) Submits a completed application under subsection (1). (b) Pays the applicable license fee under subsection (3). (c) Completes and passes an inspection under section 5(2), as applicable. (3) An applicant shall include with an application the applicable license fee as follows: (a) A small-scale dog breeding kennel license, $500.00. (b) A large-scale dog breeding kennel license, $1,000.00. (4) A license granted under this section is valid for 1 year from the date of issuance. (5) Beginning January 1, 2030, and by January 1 every 5 years thereafter, the department may adjust the fees in subsection (3) by comparing the percentage increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index for the preceding year by the corresponding Consumer Price Index 5 years earlier. The department shall multiply that percentage change by the amounts of the fees in subsection (3), and round up each dollar value adjustment made under this subsection to the nearest dollar. As used in this subsection, "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (6) The department shall approve or deny an application for a license under this section not later than 90 days after the applicant submits a completed application. Receipt of the application is considered the date the application is received by the department. If the application is incomplete, the department shall notify the applicant in writing, or make the information electronically available, not later than 30 days after receipt of the incomplete application, and state the deficiency and request additional information or require that certain actions be taken. Unless an extension is granted by the department, the 90-day period to approve or deny an application under this subsection is tolled when the department notifies the applicant of a deficiency until the date the requested additional information is received by the department or the applicant completes any required actions. The applicant may request an extension to the 90-day timeline to provide additional information or complete required actions on a form and in a manner provided by the department. The determination of the completeness of an application is not an approval of the application for the license and does not confer eligibility of an applicant determined otherwise ineligible for issuance of a license. (7) If the department fails to issue, approve, or deny an application for a license under this section within the time required under subsection (6), the department shall return the license fee and reduce the license fee for the applicant's next renewal application, if any, by 15%. Failure to approve or deny an application for a license does not permit the department to otherwise delay the processing of the application, and that application, when complete, must be placed in sequence with other completed applications received at the same time. The department shall not discriminate against an applicant in the processing of the application based on the fact that the license fee was refunded or discounted under this subsection. Sec. 9. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the licensing and registration requirements of this act do not apply to a person an individual who breeds his or her own animals or to a person subject to 1969 PA 224, MCL 287.381 to 287.395. The licensing and registration requirements of this act apply to a large-scale dog breeding kennel. (2) Subsection (1) does not create an exemption from vaccination and licensing requirements under the dog law of 1919, 1919 PA 339, MCL 287.261 to 287.290, or from vaccination and handling requirements under 1994 PA 358, MCL 287.891 to 287.901. (3) This act does not require the alteration of a dog, cat, or ferret being reclaimed from an animal control shelter or animal protection shelter by its owner unless a local government ordinance requires the alteration. Sec. 9b. (1) If a person violates this act or a rule promulgated under this act, the director, department, after notice and an opportunity for an evidentiary hearing under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, may do either or both of the following: (a) Suspend or revoke a license or registration issued to the person under this act. (b) Impose an administrative fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. The director department shall advise the attorney general of the failure of a person to pay an administrative fine under this section. The attorney general shall bring a civil action to recover the administrative fine and costs and fees. The administrative fine shall must be deposited in the agriculture licensing and inspection fees fund created in section 9 of the insect pest and plant disease act, 1931 PA 189, MCL 286.209. (2) In addition to any other action authorized by this act, the director department may bring an action to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Obtain a declaratory judgment that a method, act, or practice is in violation of this act. (b) Obtain an injunction against a person who that is engaging, or about to engage, in a method, act, or practice that violates this act. (3) If a person fails to comply with a contract for the alteration of a dog, cat, or ferret as required under section 8a, a court with appropriate jurisdiction may order transfer of ownership of the adopted animal only to 1 of the following: (a) The facility from which the animal was adopted. (b) A veterinarian, animal control shelter, or animal protection shelter willing to accept the animal and either humanely euthanize the animal or adopt the animal to an owner who agrees to have the animal altered. Sec. 9c. (1) A An animal control shelter, animal protection shelter, pet shop, small-scale dog breeding kennel, and large-scale dog breeding kennel shall maintain current verifiable records for a period of at least 2 years. The records shall must include all of the following information: (a) The verified name and address of the person from whom the dog an animal was acquired, where the dog animal was acquired, and the date that the dog animal was acquired, as applicable. (b) A description and identification of the dog, animal, including the dog's animal's identification information, color, breed, sex, alteration status, and approximate weight and age. (c) The date and method of disposition of the dog. animal. If the dog animal is adopted, transferred, or sold, the records shall also must include the verified name and address of the person to whom the dog animal is adopted, transferred, or sold. (d) The number of dogs animals on site daily at each physical location. (e) The number of female intact breeding adult female dogs on site daily at the physical location, as applicable. (f) Breeding records for each female intact dog that include the approximate date the dog was bred and the birth date and size of each litter during the time that the dog was at the physical location, as applicable. (2) A An animal control shelter, animal protection shelter, pet shop, small-scale dog breeding kennel, or large-scale dog breeding kennel shall make the records required under subsection (1) available to the director or his or her representative department on request. Sec. 10. Any A person who that violates the provisions of this act or any a rule of the department of agriculture promulgated under the provisions of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor. Enacting section 1. Section 9d of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.339d, is repealed.